Utah statutes.
10-6-136.   Increase in appropriations for operating and capital budget funds -- Notice.

The total budget appropriation of any fund described in Section 10-6-135 may be increased by resolution of the governing body at any regular meeting, or special meeting called for that purpose, provided that written notice of the time, place and purpose of the meeting shall have been mailed or delivered to all members of the governing body at least five days prior to the meeting. The notice may be waived in writing or orally during attendance at the meeting by any member of the governing body.

